Utah statutes.
34-30-9.   Violation of chapter -- Failure to keep or produce records -- Misdemeanor.

Any officer, agent or representative of the state, or of any political subdivision, district or municipality of it who shall violate, or omit to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter, and any contractor or subcontractor, or agent or representative thereof, doing such public work, who shall neglect to keep, or cause to be kept, an accurate record of the names, occupation and actual wages paid to each laborer, workman and mechanic employed by him, in connection with this public work or who shall refuse to allow access to same at any reasonable hour to any person authorized to inspect same under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

